Utah statutes.
58-28-301.   Licensure required.
(1) (a)  A license is required to engage in the practice of veterinary
medicine, except as specifically provided in Sections 58-1-307 and 58-28-307.
(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 58-1-307(1)(c) an individual
shall be licensed under this chapter as a veterinary intern in order to engage
in a program of indirectly supervised clinical training with a veterinarian
licensed under this chapter, and as necessary to meet licensing requirements
under Subsection 58-28-302(1)(d).
(2)  The division shall issue to a person who qualifies under this chapter a
license in the classification of:
(a)  veterinarian; or
(b)  veterinarian intern.
